New York, session 2025-2026, A10526.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The racing, pari-mutuel wagering and breeding law is 2 amended by adding a new section 1367-b to read as follows: 3 § 1367-b. Mobile sports wagering; geofencing restrictions for college 4 campuses. 1. For purposes of this section: 5 (a) "Mobile sports wagering operator" shall have the same meaning as 6 set forth in section thirteen hundred sixty-seven-a of this article; and 7 (b) "Platform provider" shall have the same meaning as set forth in 8 section thirteen hundred sixty-seven of this article. 9 2. No mobile sports wagering operator or platform provider licensed 10 pursuant to section thirteen hundred sixty-seven-a of this article shall 11 permit, accept, or facilitate the placement of a sports wager through a 12 mobile application or platform from any individual physically located on 13 any college campus located within New York state. 14 3. All mobile sports wagering operators and platform providers shall, 15 on or before August first, two thousand twenty-seven, implement geoloca- 16 tion and geofencing technology to ensure compliance with the provisions 17 of subdivision two of this section. Such technology shall be capable of 18 reasonably detecting and preventing wagering activity occurring on the 19 property described herein. 20 4. Any college with a campus located within New York state shall coop- 21 erate with the commission in providing the necessary geographic data and 22 campus boundary information to effectuate compliance with this section. 23 5. The commission shall promulgate such rules and regulations as may 24 be necessary to implement the provisions of this section, including the 25 establishment of civil penalties for violations. 26 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13760-03-6